Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act:

(1) Adversary nation means those countries listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;

(2)(a) Agent of a foreign principal means:

(i) Any person who directly, or through any other person, within the State of Nebraska, engages in covered activities and who acts:

(A) As an agent, representative, employee, or servant, of a foreign principal; or

(B) In any other capacity at the order or request or under the direction or control, of a foreign principal or of a person, any of whose activities are directly or indirectly supervised, directed, controlled, financed, or subsidized in whole or in part by, a foreign principal; or

(ii) Any person who agrees, consents, assumes, or purports to act as, or who is or purports to be, whether or not pursuant to a contractual relationship, an agent of a foreign principal as defined in subdivision (2)(a)(i) of this section.

(b) Agent of a foreign principal does not include any media entity, solely by virtue of any bona fide news or journalistic activities, including the solicitation or acceptance of advertisements, subscriptions, or other compensation therefor, so long as:

(i) The media entity is at least eighty percent beneficially owned by citizens of the United States;

(ii) Any officers and directors of the media entity are citizens of the United States; and

(iii) The media entity is not owned, directed, supervised, controlled, subsidized, or financed, and none of its policies are determined by, any foreign principal or by any agent of a foreign principal required to register under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act;

(3) Covered activities means:

(a) Engaging in political activities for, or in the interests of, a foreign principal;

(b) Acting as a public relations counsel, publicity agent, information-service employee or political consultant for, or in the interests of, a foreign principal;

(c) Soliciting, collecting, disbursing, or dispensing contributions, loans, money, or other things of value for, or in the interests of, a foreign principal; or

(d) Representing the interests of such foreign principal before any agency or official of this state or a political subdivision of this state;

(4) False statement of material fact includes any of the following with respect to a registration statement, a supplement to such statement, or any document filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act:

(a) A false statement of material fact;

(b) An omission of a material fact required to be reported; and

(c) An omission of a material fact or copy of a material document necessary to make the statements made in such statement, supplement, or document not misleading;

(5) Foreign political party means any organization or any other combination of individuals in a country other than the United States, or any unit or branch thereof, having for an aim or purpose, or which is engaged in any activity devoted in whole or in part to, the establishment, administration, control, or acquisition of administration or control, of a government of a foreign country or a subdivision thereof, or the furtherance or influencing of the political or public interests, policies, or relations of a government of a foreign country or a subdivision thereof;

(6) Foreign principal means:

(a) A government of a foreign country, any agency or instrumentality of such government, or a foreign political party;

(b) A person outside of the United States, unless it is established that such person is an individual and a citizen or permanent resident of and domiciled within the United States, or that such person is not an individual and is organized under or created by the laws of the United States or of any state or other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States and has its principal place of business within the United States;

(c) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country;

(d) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons that is at least twenty percent beneficially owned by a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country;

(e) Any person that owns or operates in whole or in part an entity described in subdivision (6)(d) of this section;

(f) Any person that is owned or operated in whole or in part by a person or entity described in subdivision (6)(a), (b), (c), or (e) of this section; or

(g) A foreign terrorist organization;

(7) Foreign terrorist organization means an organization included on the United States Department of State's list of designated foreign terrorist organizations pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1189, as such section existed on April 1, 2025;

(8) Government of a foreign country means any person or group of persons exercising sovereign de facto or de jure political jurisdiction over any country, other than the United States, or over any part of such country, and includes any subdivision of any such group and any group or agency to which such sovereign de facto or de jure authority or functions are directly or indirectly delegated. Such term shall include any faction or body of insurgents within a country assuming to exercise governmental authority whether such faction or body of insurgents has or has not been recognized by the United States;

(9) Information service employee means any person who is engaged in furnishing, disseminating, or publishing accounts, descriptions, information, or data with respect to the political, industrial, employment, economic, social, cultural, or other benefits, advantages, facts, or conditions of any country other than the United States, any government of a foreign country, any foreign political party, or a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of individuals organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country;

(10) Media entity means any:

(a) News or press service or association organized under the laws of the United States, any state, or any other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

(b) Newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other publication; or

(c) Website or application that enables users to create and share content or to participate in social networking;

(11) Owned or operated in whole or in part means that a person has the power, directly or indirectly, whether or not exercised, to determine, direct, or decide important matters affecting an entity including through:

(a) The ownership of at least twenty percent of the total outstanding voting interest in an entity;

(b) Board representation;

(c) The ability to appoint or discharge any board members, officers, or directors;

(d) Proxy voting, a special share, contractual arrangements, legal obligations, or formal or informal arrangements to act in concert; or

(e) Any other means;

(12) Person means an individual, a partnership, an association, a corporation, an organization, or any other entity or combination of individuals;

(13) Political activities means any activity that the person engaging in believes will, or that the person intends to, in any way influence any agency or official of this state or a political subdivision of this state with reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the domestic or foreign policies of the United States or of the State of Nebraska with reference to the political or public interests, policies, or relations of a government of a foreign country or a foreign political party;

(14) Political consultant means any person who engages in informing or advising any other person with reference to the policies of the State of Nebraska or the political or public interest, policies, or relations of a foreign country or of a foreign political party;

(15) Political propaganda means information, especially of a biased or misleading nature, used to promote the political cause or point of view of an adversary nation, a foreign terrorist organization, or a political party from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization;

(16) Postsecondary educational institution has the same meaning as postsecondary institution in section 85-2403;

(17) Prints means newspapers, periodicals, books, pamphlets, sheet music, visiting cards, address cards, printing proofs, engravings, photographs, pictures, drawings, plans, maps, patterns to be cut out, catalogs, prospectuses, and advertisements; printed, engraved, lithographed, or autographed notices of various kinds; and, in general, all impressions or reproductions obtained on paper or other material assimilable to paper, on parchment or on cardboard, by means of printing, engraving, lithography, autography, or any other easily recognizable mechanical process, with the exception of the copying press, stamps with movable or immovable type, and the typewriter;

(18) Public relations counsel means any person who engages directly or indirectly in informing, advising, or in any way representing a principal in any public relations matter pertaining to political or public interests, policies, or relations of such principal;

(19) Publicity agent means any person who engages directly or indirectly in the publication or dissemination of oral, visual, graphic, written, or pictorial information or matter of any kind, including publication by means of advertising, books, periodicals, newspapers, lectures, broadcasts, motion pictures, or otherwise;

(20) Registration statement means the registration statement required to be filed with the Attorney General under section 4-204, and any supplements to such statement required to be filed under such section, and includes all documents and papers required to be filed with, or in amendment to, such statement or supplements, whether attached or incorporated by reference; and

(21) United States, when used in a geographical sense, means the several states, the District of Columbia, the territories, the insular possessions, and all other places now or hereafter subject to the civil or military jurisdiction of the United States.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 3.